Delaware, session 153, HB200.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Chapter 33, Title 18 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 3370N. Coverage for pre-exposure prophylaxis treatment and post-exposure prophylaxis treatment. (a) As used in this section: (1) âCost-sharing requirementâ includes a deductible, coinsurance, copayment, and out-of-pocket expense. (2) âHIVâ means the human immunodeficiency virus. (3) âMedically necessaryâ includes prescribing PrEP and PEP to individuals who are at increased risk of HIV acquisition. (4) âPEPâ means post-exposure prophylaxis medication for preventing HIV infection after possible HIV exposure. (5) âPrEPâ means pre-exposure prophylaxis medication for preventing HIV infection before possible HIV exposure. (b)(1) All individual health insurance policies, contracts, or certificates that are delivered, issued for delivery, renewed, extended, or modified in this State must provide coverage for all of the following: a. Medically necessary PrEP. b. Medically necessary PEP. (2) The coverage required under paragraph (b)(1) of this section must be provided without any of the following: a. Cost-sharing requirements. b. Prior authorization or step therapy requirements. c. Unreasonable delay in coverage determination. (c) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, nothing in this section prevents the operation of a policy provision required by this section as a deductible, coinsurance, allowable charge limitation, coordination of benefits, or a provision restricting coverage to services by a licensed, certified, or carrier-approved provider or facility. (d) This section does not apply to accident-only, specified disease, hospital indemnity, Medicare supplement, long-term care, disability income, or other limited health insurance policies. (e)(1) The cost-sharing limitation under paragraph (b)(2) of this section does not apply to a catastrophic health plan to the extent this cost-sharing limitation would cause the plan to fail to be treated as a catastrophic health plan under Â§ 1302(e) of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, 42 U.S.C. Â§ 18022(e). (2)a. The cost-sharing limitation under paragraph (b)(2) of this section does not apply to a high deductible health plan to the extent this cost-sharing limitation would cause the plan to fail to be treated as a high deductible health plan under Â§ 223(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code. b. If the cost-sharing limitation under paragraph (b)(2) of this section would result in an enrollee becoming ineligible for a health savings account under federal law, the cost-sharing limitation only applies to a qualified high deductible plan after the enrolleeâs deductible has been met. Section 2. Amend Chapter 35, Title 18 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 3571FF. Coverage for pre-exposure prophylaxis treatment and post-exposure prophylaxis treatment. (a) As used in this section: (1) âCost-sharing requirementâ includes a deductible, coinsurance, copayment, and out-of-pocket expense. (2) âHIVâ means the human immunodeficiency virus. (3) âMedically necessaryâ includes prescribing PrEP and PEP to individuals who are at increased risk of HIV acquisition. (4) âPEPâ means post-exposure prophylaxis medication for preventing HIV infection after possible HIV exposure. (5) âPrEPâ means pre-exposure prophylaxis medication for preventing HIV infection before possible HIV exposure. (b)(1) All individual health insurance policies, contracts, or certificates that are delivered, issued for delivery, renewed, extended, or modified in this State must provide coverage for all of the following: a. Medically necessary PrEP. b. Medically necessary PEP. (2) The coverage required under paragraph (b)(1) of this section must be provided without any of the following: a. Cost-sharing requirements. b. Prior authorization or step therapy requirements. c. Unreasonable delay in coverage determination. (c) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, nothing in this section prevents the operation of a policy provision required by this section as a deductible, coinsurance, allowable charge limitation, coordination of benefits, or a provision restricting coverage to services by a licensed, certified, or carrier-approved provider or facility. (d) This section does not apply to accident-only, specified disease, hospital indemnity, Medicare supplement, long-term care, disability income, or other limited health insurance policies. (e)(1) The cost-sharing limitation under paragraph (b)(2) of this section does not apply to a catastrophic health plan to the extent this cost-sharing limitation would cause the plan to fail to be treated as a catastrophic health plan under Â§ 1302(e) of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, 42 U.S.C. Â§ 18022(e). (2)a. The cost-sharing limitation under paragraph (b)(2) of this section does not apply to a high deductible health plan to the extent this cost-sharing limitation would cause the plan to fail to be treated as a high deductible health plan under Â§ 223(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code. b. If the cost-sharing limitation under paragraph (b)(2) of this section would result in an enrollee becoming ineligible for a health savings account under federal law, the cost-sharing limitation only applies to a qualified high deductible plan after the enrolleeâs deductible has been met. Section 3. Amend Chapter 52, Title 29 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 5224. Coverage for pre-exposure prophylaxis treatment and post-exposure prophylaxis treatment. (a) As used in this section: (1) âCost-sharing requirementâ includes a deductible, coinsurance, copayment, and out-of-pocket expense. (2) âHIVâ means the human immunodeficiency virus. (3) âMedically necessaryâ includes prescribing PrEP and PEP to individuals who are at increased risk of HIV acquisition. (4) âPEPâ means post-exposure prophylaxis medication for preventing HIV infection after possible HIV exposure. (5) âPrEPâ means pre-exposure prophylaxis medication for preventing HIV infection before possible HIV exposure. (b)(1) The plan must provide coverage for all of the following: a. Medically necessary PrEP. b. Medically necessary PEP. (2) The coverage required under paragraph (b)(1) of this section must be provided without any of the following: a. Cost-sharing requirements. b. Prior authorization or step therapy requirements. c. Unreasonable delay in coverage determination. Section 4. Amend Chapter 5, Title 31 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 539. Coverage for pre-exposure prophylaxis treatment and post-exposure prophylaxis treatment. (a) As used in this section: (1) âCost-sharing requirementâ includes a deductible, coinsurance, copayment, and out-of-pocket expense. (2) âHIVâ means the human immunodeficiency virus. (3) âMedically necessaryâ includes prescribing PrEP and PEP to individuals who are at increased risk of HIV acquisition. (4) âPEPâ means post-exposure prophylaxis medication for preventing HIV infection after possible HIV exposure. (5) âPrEPâ means pre-exposure prophylaxis medication for preventing HIV infection before possible HIV exposure. (b)(1) Carriers shall provide coverage for all of the following: a. Medically necessary PrEP. b. Medically necessary PEP. (2) To the extent permitted by federal law, the coverage required under paragraph (b)(1) of this section must be provided without any of the following: a. Cost-sharing requirements. b. Prior authorization or step therapy requirements. c. Unreasonable delay in coverage determination. Section 5. This Act applies to all policies, contracts, or certificates that are renewed, modified, altered, amended, or reissued after December 31, 2027.